da: Erhverv og industri > Medicinsk: Hospitalsgardiner; Hospitalskapper; Sengetøj til hospitaler; Medicinsk udstyr; Møbler til hospitaler og læger; Medicinske instrumenter; Medicinsk tilbehør; Medicinsk undervisningsudstyr; Operationshuer; Operationskitler
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Sectorul medical: Perdele de spital; Halate de spital; Lenjerie de pat de uz medical; Echipamente medicale; Mobilier medical; Instrumente medicale; Articole medicale; Echipament medical pentru pregătire; Bonete uniforme medicale; Halate chirurgicale
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Orvosi: Kórházi függönyök; Kórházi köpenyek; Orvosi ágynemű; Orvosi berendezések; Orvosi bútorok; Orvosi műszerek; Orvosi kellékek; Orvosi oktatási berendezések; Műtős sapkák; Sebészeti köpenyek
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zdravstvo: Bolnišnične zavese; Bolnišnične halje; Medicinska posteljnina; Medicinska oprema; Medicinsko pohištvo; Medicinski instrumenti; Medicinska oprema; Medicinska učna oprema; Kirurške kape; Kirurške halje
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medicina: Ligoninės užuolaidos; Ligoninės chalatai; Medicininė patalynė; Medicinos įranga; Medicininiai baldai; Medicinos instrumentai; Medicinos reikmenys; Medicinos mokymo įranga; Chirurginės kepuraitės; Chirurginiai chalatai
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zdravotníctvo: Nemocničné závesy; Nemocničné plášte; Nemocničná posteľná bielizeň; Zdravotnícke vybavenie; Zdravotnícky nábytok; Lekárske nástroje; Zdravotnícky materiál; Zdravotnícke vyučovacie zariadenia; Chirurgické čiapky; Chirurgické plášte
nb: Forretninger og industri > Medisinsk: Sykehusforheng; Sykehuskåper; Medisinsk sengetøy; Medisinsk utstyr; Medisinske møbler; Medisinske instrumenter; Medisinsk forbruksmateriell; Medisinsk opplæringsutstyr; Sykepleierluer; Kirurgifrakker
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zdravotnictví: Nemocniční závěsy; Nemocniční oblečení; Zdravotnické lůžkoviny; Zdravotnické vybavení; Lékařský nábytek; Lékařské nástroje; Zdravotnické potřeby; Výukové pomůcky pro zdravotnické a lékařské obory; Operační čepice; Chirurgické pláště
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Branża medyczna: Zasłony szpitalne; Fartuchy lekarskie; Pościel szpitalna; Sprzęt medyczny; Meble medyczne; Instrumenty medyczne; Medyczne materiały eksploatacyjne; Sprzęt do szkoleń medycznych; Czepki lekarskie; Fartuchy chirurgiczne
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Medisch: Ziekenhuisgordijnen; Ziekenhuisjasjes; Medisch bedlinnen; Medische apparatuur; Medisch meubilair; Medische instrumenten; Medische benodigdheden; Apparatuur voor medisch onderwijs; Operatiekappen; Operatiejasjes
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Medikal: Hastane Perdeleri; Hastane Önlükleri; Medikal Yatak Takımları; Medikal Ekipmanlar; Medikal Mobilyalar; Tıbbi Aletler; Medikal Sarf Malzemeleri; Tıp Eğitimi Ekipmanları; Cerrahi Boneler; Cerrahi Önlükler
es: Economía e industria > Productos médicos: Cortinas de hospital; Batas de hospital; Ropa de cama médica; Equipo médico; Mobiliario médico; Instrumentos médicos; Material médico; Equipos para la docencia médica; Gorros quirúrgicos; Batas quirúrgicas
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Medicina: Bolničke zavjese; Bolničke haljine; Medicinska posteljina; Medicinska oprema; Medicinski namještaj; Medicinski instrumenti; Medicinske potrepštine; Medicinska oprema za učenje; Medicinske kape; Kirurške haljine
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Médico: Cortinas hospitalares; Fatos hospitalares; Roupa de cama hospitalar; Equipamento médico; Mobiliário médico; Instrumentos médicos; Artigos médicos; Equipamento de ensino médico; Toucas; Fatos cirúrgicos
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 医疗: 医用隔帘; 住院服; 医用床上用品; 医疗器械; 医用家具; 医疗仪器; 医疗用品; 医疗教学设备; 手术帽/无尘帽; 手术服
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การแพทย์: ม่านโรงพยาบาล; เสื้อกาวน์โรงพยาบาล; เตียงทางการแพทย์; อุปกรณ์ทางการแพทย์; เฟอร์นิเจอร์ทางการแพทย์; เครื่องมือทางการแพทย์; อุปกรณ์การแพทย์; อุปกรณ์ช่วยสอนทางการแพทย์; หมวกชุดสครับ; เสื้อกาวน์ผ่าตัด
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 医療: 医療施設用カーテン; 検診衣・患者衣; 医療寝具; 医療機器; 医療用家具; 医療用器具; 医療用品; 医療教育用品; 手術帽; 手術衣
sv: Företag och industri > Sjukvård: Sjukhusdraperier; Patientrockar; Sängkläder för sjukvård; Medicinsk utrustning; Sjukhusmöbler; Medicinska instrument; Medicinska förbrukningsartiklar; Medicinsk utbildningsutrustning; Operationsmössor; Operationsrockar
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Медицина: Медицинские шторы; Больничные сорочки и халаты; Постельное белье для больниц; Медицинское оборудование; Медицинская мебель; Медицинские инструменты; Медицинские расходные материалы; Медицинское оборудование для обучения; Медицинские шапочки; Хирургические халаты
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Medicina: Cortinas hospitalares; Avental hospitalar; Roupa de cama hospitalar; Equipamento médico; Móveis médicos; Instrumentos médicos; Suprimentos médicos; Equipamento de ensino médico; Toucas cirúrgicas; Aventais cirúrgicos
en: Business & Industrial > Medical: Hospital Curtains; Hospital Gowns; Medical Bedding; Medical Equipment; Medical Furniture; Medical Instruments; Medical Supplies; Medical Teaching Equipment; Scrub Caps; Surgical Gowns
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Медицински: Болнични завеси; Болнични нощници; Медицинско спално бельо; Медицинско оборудване; Медицинско обзавеждане; Медицински инструменти; Медицински консумативи; Медицинско учебно оборудване; Медицински шапки; Хирургически престилки
it: Commercio e industria > Medicina: Tende ospedaliere; Camici da ospedale; Biancheria da letto medica; Apparecchiature mediche; Arredamento medico; Strumenti medici; Prodotti medici; Apparecchiature formative per medici; Copricapo chirurgici; Camici chirurgici
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Y tế: Rèm bệnh viện; Áo choàng bệnh viện; Bộ đồ giường bệnh viện; Thiết bị y tế; Trang bị y tế; Dụng cụ y tế; Trang thiết bị y tế; Thiết bị giảng dạy y tế; Mũ phẫu thuật; Bộ đồ phẫu thuật
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Medizinischer Bereich: Krankenhaus-Vorhänge; Krankenhausbekleidung; Medizinische Bettwäsche; Medizinische Geräte; Medizinische Möbel; Medizinische Instrumente; Medizinischer Bedarf; Medizinische Schulungsgeräte; OP-Hauben; OP-Kittel
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ιατρικά είδη: Κουρτίνες νοσοκομείου; Νοσοκομειακές ρόμπες; Ιατρικά κλινοσκεπάσματα; Ιατρικός εξοπλισμός; Ιατρικά έπιπλα; Ιατρικά όργανα; Ιατρικές προμήθειες; Ιατρικός εκπαιδευτικός εξοπλισμός; Σκούφοι χειρουργείου; Χειρουργικές ρόμπες
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 醫療業: 醫院布簾; 病服; 醫療用床具; 醫療設備; 醫療家具; 醫療器材; 醫療用品; 醫療教育設備; 刷手帽; 手術衣
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lääketiede: Sairaalaverhot; Sairaalakaavut; Sairaalan vuodevaatteet; Lääketieteelliset laitteet; Sairaalakalusteet; Lääketieteelliset instrumentit; Lääketieteelliset tarvikkeet; Lääketieteelliset opetusvälineet; Leikkauspäähineet; Leikkauskaavut
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 의료: 병원 커튼; 병원 가운; 의료용 침구; 의료 장비; 의료용 가구; 의료 기구; 의료 용품; 의료 교육 장비; 수술용 모자; 수술 가운
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Secteur médical: Rideaux d’hôpitaux; Blouses d’hôpital; Literie médicale; Équipement médical; Meubles pour le secteur médical; Instruments médicaux; Matériel médical; Matériel d’enseignement médical; Charlottes médicales; Blouses chirurgicales